Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.160

Judges' salaries.

The total of the salaries of each municipal judge under this chapter shall be fixed by the legislative body of the city at not less than nine thousand dollars per annum, to be paid in monthly or semimonthly installments as for other officials of the city, and such total salaries shall not be more than the salaries paid the superior court judges in the county in which the court is located.

[ 1965 c 147 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.160. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 16.]

NOTES:

Cities over four hundred thousand, district court judges' salaries: RCW 3.58.010.